test/src/gt-desc-yamls/proper-even_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable propers belonging to OY-plc, HAWAII-plc, SKOHTERMADII-plc, SIJTE-plc, NYSTØ-plc, MARJA-U-plc, MARJA-I-plc, BERN-ani/BERN-plc,
# DUBAI-sur, HEANDARAT-plc, VARGGAT-plc, ALEUHTAT-plc, ACCRA-plc, NIKOSIIJA-obj,
# NYSTØ, C-FI-NEN-sur, RONDANE-obj, SKANIK-plc, ALBMOTMUSEA-obj

Tests:

  Proper - Bissau: # BISSAU-plc
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bissau
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bissauii
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: bissaulažžii
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: bissaulažžai

  Proper - Algrøy: # OY-plc
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Algrøya
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Algrøyai
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: algrøyalažžii
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: algrøyalažžai
    
  Proper - Hawaii: # HAWAII-plc
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Hawaii
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Hawaii
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: [Hawaii-a, "Hawaii:a", Hawaii'a]
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: [Hawaii-, Hawaii', "Hawaii:"]
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: Hawaiia
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Hawaiijii
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Hawaiii
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Hawaii'ai, Hawaii-ii, "Hawaii:ai", Hawaii'ii, Hawaii-ai, "Hawaii:ii"]
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [Hawaii-j, Hawaii'j, "Hawaii:j"]
    Hawaii+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Hawaiiii, Hawaiiai]
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: hawaiilažžii
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: hawaiilažžai

  Proper - Nordlánddaruovdemáđii: # SKOHTERMADII-plc
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđija, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeaji]
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: Nordlánddaruovdemáđi
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđidjii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeadjái]

  Proper - Gaarphkdaelie: # SIJTE-plc
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Gaarphkdaelie
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Gaarphkdaeliei
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: gaarphkdaelielažžii
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: gaarphkdaelielažžai

  Proper - Bittersjø: # NYSTØ-plc
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bittersjø
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: [Bittersjø'a, Bittersjø-a, "Bittersjø:a"]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ["Bittersjø:", Bittersjø', Bittersjø-]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: Bittersjøa
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bittersjøi
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Bittersjø-ai, Bittersjø-ii, Bittersjø'ai, Bittersjø'ii, "Bittersjø:ii", "Bittersjø:ai"]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [Bittersjø'j, Bittersjø-j, "Bittersjø:j"]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Bittersjøai, Bittersjøii]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: bittersjølažžii
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: bittersjølažžai

  Proper - Klareatnu: # MARJA-U-plc
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Klareanu
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Allegro: Klareano
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Klaretnui
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: klareatnulažžii
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: klareatnulažžai
  
  Proper - Klemmoaivi: # MARJA-I-plc
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Klemmoaivvi
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Allegro: Klemmoaivve
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Klemmoaivái
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: klemmoaivilažžii
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: klemmoaivilažžai
    
  Proper - Kerberos: # BERN-ani/BERN-plc
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:          Kerberosa
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: Kerberos-a
    Kerberos+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: "Kerberos:a"
    Kerberos+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Kerberosa
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Allegro: Kerberos
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kerberosii
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: ["Kerberos:ii", Kerberos-ii]
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: "Kerberos:i"
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: Kerberos-i
    Kerberos+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: "Kerberos:ii"
    Kerberos+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: "Kerberos:i"

  Proper - Stai: # DUBAI-sur
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: [Staja, Stai]
    Stai+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Staia
    Stai+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: [Stai, Staia]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: [Stai-a, "Sta:i", "Sta:ia"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: [Stai-, Stai-a, "Stai:a", "Stai:"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: [Stai-a, "Stai:a"]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Stajii
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [Stai-ii, "Sta:iii"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [Stai-ii, "Stai:ii"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Stai-i, "Stai:i"]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Stai-i, "Sta:ii"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: [Stai-ii, "Stai:ii"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Stai-i, "Stai:i"]
    Stai+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Staiii
    Stai+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Staiii

  Proper - Sieinnus-Návggastat: # HEANDARAT-plc
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Sieinnus-Návggastaga
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Seainnus/Návggastaga
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Sieinnus-Návggastahkii
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Seainnus/Návggastahkii
    
  Proper - Šleađut: # VARGGAT-plc
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Šleađuid
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Šleađuide
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: šleađutlažžii
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: šleađutlažžai

  Proper - Doaresdievát: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Doaresdieváid
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Doaresdieváide
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: doaresdievátlažžii
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: doaresdievátlažžai
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: doaresdievválažžii
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: doaresdievválažžai
    
  Proper - Romania: # ACCRA-plc
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romania
    Romania+Err/Orth-a-á+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Románia
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Romaniai
    Romania+Err/Orth-a-á+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Romániai
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: romanialažžii
    Romania+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: romanialažžai
    Romania+Err/Orth-a-á+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: románialažžii
    Romania+Err/Orth-a-á+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: románialažžai
    
  Proper - Kaffegalleriija: # NIKOSIIJA-obj
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Kaffegalleriijai

  Proper - Bergsjø: # NYSTØ
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bergsjø
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: Bergsjøa
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ["Bergsjø:", Bergsjø-, Bergsjø']
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth: ["Bergsjø:a", Bergsjø-a, Bergsjø'a]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bergsjøi
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: [Bergsjøii, Bergsjøai]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: ["Bergsjø:ai", "Bergsjø:ii", Bergsjø-ai, Bergsjø-ii, Bergsjø'ai, Bergsjø'ii]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: ["Bergsjø:j", Bergsjø-j, Bergsjø'j]

  Proper - Sottinen: # C-FI-NEN-sur
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: [Sottisa, Sottinena]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ["Sottinen:a", Sottinen-a]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: [Sottinenii, Sottisii]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: ["Sottinen:ii", Sottinen-ii]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: ["Sottinen:i", Sottinen-i]
 
  Proper - BackOffice: # RONDANE-obj
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: BackOfficii

  Proper - Baikalágojávrrik: # SKANIK-plc
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Baikalágojávrriid
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Baikalágojávrriide
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: baikalágojávrriklažžii
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: baikalágojávrriklažžai
    
  Proper - Eksekutivkomitea: # ALBMOTMUSEA-org
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Eksekutivkomitea
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Eksekutivkomiteii
